Utah statutes.
38-11-110.   Issuance of certificates of compliance.
(1) (a)  The director may issue a certificate of compliance only after
determining through an informal proceeding, as set forth in Title 63G, Chapter
4, Administrative Procedures Act:
(i)  that the owner is in compliance with Subsections 38-11-204(4)(a) and (b);
or
(ii)  subject to Subsection (2), that the owner is entitled to protection
under Subsection 38-11-107(1)(b).
(b)  If the director determines through an informal proceeding under
Subsection (1)(a) that an owner seeking the issuance of a certificate of
compliance under Subsection (1)(a)(i) is not in compliance as provided in
Subsection (1)(a)(i), the director may not issue a certificate of compliance.
(2) (a)  An owner seeking the issuance of a certificate of compliance under
Subsection (1)(a)(ii) shall submit an affidavit, as defined by the division by
rule, affirming that the owner is entitled to protection under Subsection
38-11-107(1)(b).
(b)  If an owner's affidavit under Subsection (2)(a) is disputed, the owner
may file a complaint in small claims court or district court to resolve the
dispute.
(c)  The director may issue a certificate of compliance to an owner seeking
issuance of a certificate under Subsection (1)(a)(ii) if:
(i)  the owner's affidavit under Subsection (2)(a) is undisputed; or
(ii)  a small claims court or district court resolves any dispute over the
owner's affidavit in favor of the owner.
